District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Emergency Rental Assistance Program Reform Congressional Review
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 8f of the Homeless Services Reform Act of 2005, effective March 10,
2023 (D.C. Law 24-287; D.C. Official Code § 4-753.08), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (2)(A) is amended as follows:
(A) The lead-in language is amended to read as follows:
“(2)(A) To qualify for Emergency Rental Assistance Funds, an applicant unit shall
be required to document:”.
(B) Sub-subparagraph (iv) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and
inserting a semicolon in its place.
(C) Sub-subparagraph (v) is amended by striking the phrase “for
payment.” and inserting the phrase “for payment; and” in its place.
(D) A new sub-subparagraph (vi) is added to read as follows:
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(vi) The nature of the emergency situation; provided, that if the
nature of the emergency situation precludes documentation, an unsworn declaration made under
penalty of perjury explaining both the emergency situation and the reason why the applicant unit
does not possess documentation regarding the nature of the emergency situation may be
considered sufficient documentation of proof for this element of an application.”.
(2) Paragraph (3) is repealed.
(b) Subsection (d)(3) is amended to read as follows:
“(3) “Emergency situation” means a situation in which immediate action is
necessary to avoid homelessness or eviction, to re-establish a rental home, or otherwise to
prevent displacement from a rental home, which is the result of an unforeseen or unusual event,
such as the loss of a job or high medical costs, that impacts the applicant unit’s ability to pay rent
and that cannot be resolved without financial assistance.”.
(c) A new subsection (e) is added to read as follows:
“(e) The Mayor shall issue regulations implementing the provisions of this section.”.
Sec. 3. The Rental Housing Act of 1985, effective July 17, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-10; D.C.
Official Code § 42-3505.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 42-3501.03) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (12A) is added to read as follows:
“(12A) “ERAP provider” means a vendor that processes applications for Emergency
Rental Assistance Funds.”.
(2) A new paragraph (23A) is added to read as follows:
“(23A) “Payment information” means documents or information that identify the
owner or manager of a rental unit, identify the balance of rent owed by a tenant, or facilitate the
payment of the owner or manager of a rental unit, and that are necessary to perfect an application
for Emergency Rental Assistance Funds, which may include personal identification, a W-9 form,
a basic business license, proof of a Social Security Number, a property management agreement,
or a rent ledger, but which shall not include the content of, or information associated with, a
payment plan.”.
(b) Section 501 (D.C. Official Code § 42–3505.01) is amended to read as follows:
(1) Subsection (r) is amended to read as follows:
“(r)(1) The court may stay any proceeding adjudicating a claim brought by a housing
provider to recover possession of a rental unit for nonpayment of rent if a tenant submits
documentation to the court demonstrating that he or she has a pending Emergency Rental
Assistance Program (“ERAP”) application; provided, that the court may stay a proceeding under
this subsection only once during the pendency of the case.
“(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall not be construed to limit a court’s
discretion to extend a stay.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) When an eviction based solely on a claim for nonpayment of rent has been
authorized by the court and the tenant notifies the housing provider, no later than 48 hours prior
to the scheduled date and time of the eviction, that the tenant has an approved ERAP application
that would pay the full amount necessary to redeem the tenancy, the housing provider shall
cancel the eviction. If the housing provider then reschedules the eviction, the housing provider
shall reschedule the eviction for a date no sooner than 3 weeks from the earlier-scheduled
eviction date.
“(4) A housing provider that cancels an eviction under paragraph (3) of this
subsection shall have leave to file an alias writ (“writ”), and no further leave of court shall be
required for the next-requested issuance of a writ following the cancellation of the originally
scheduled eviction. This paragraph shall not apply if a judgment is permanently stayed by a
tenant’s redemption of a tenancy.”.
(2) New subsections (s) and (t) are added to read as follows:
“(s) In any matter adjudicating a claim brought by a housing provider to recover
possession of a rental unit for nonpayment of rent in which the tenant alleges, at or before an
initial hearing, that the housing provider is withholding payment information requested by an
ERAP provider, the court may order the housing provider to comply with any pending requests
for the payment information from an ERAP provider.
“(t)(1) In any matter adjudicating a claim brought by a housing provider to recover
possession of a rental unit for nonpayment of rent in which the court finds, at trial or upon the
resolution of a dispositive motion resolving the entire matter, that the housing provider failed to
provide payment information requested by an ERAP provider for more than 45 days after
receiving a request for the payment information from an ERAP provider, the court may order that
the amount of rent that would have been redeemed by a successful ERAP application be deemed
waived and shall not be recoverable by the housing provider.
“(2) The court shall not waive rent under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the
housing provider shows that:
“(A) Compliance with a request for payment information necessary to
perfect an ERAP application was delayed by a third party not under the control of the housing
provider;
“(B) Good cause otherwise exists for the housing provider’s non-
compliance; or
“(C) The housing provider has, since the date of the relevant request for
payment information, received payment from ERAP on behalf of the tenant.
“(3) A waiver of rent under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall apply to any
future proceeding in which the housing provider seeks from the tenant:
“(A) The recovery of possession of the rental unit the rent for which was
waived under paragraph (1) of this subsection; or
“(B) A money judgment for the waived rent.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(4) Nothing in this subsection shall limit a tenant’s ability to assert any defense
to an outstanding rent balance sought by a housing provider.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
4